Mississippi, session 2026, HB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For purposes of this section, "nonfault incident" means an accident, collision, or other incident involving a vehicle covered by a policy issued by the insurer in which the driver of the insured vehicle was not at fault, regardless of whether the incident was reported to any law enforcement agency. (2)  No insurer shall increase the rate, increase or add a surcharge, cancel, or fail to renew any policy of motor vehicle insurance when such action is based on consideration of one or more nonfault incidents. (3)  Any insurer who violates this section shall refund to the insured person the amount of premium that was paid which exceeded the premium that would have been charged if the insurer had complied with this section, together with a penalty payment in amount equal to triple the amount of the refund or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever is greater.  The insured shall also be entitled to attorney fees should he or she prevail. (4)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, one or more nonfault accidents or collisions shall not be the sole basis for an insurer's denial of an application for a policy of motor vehicle insurance, and such an accident or collision shall not be considered by an insurer in determining the rates for such a policy.  In addition, no insurer shall require that such coverage be provided by another insurer based solely upon such an accident or collision. SECTION 2.  Section 83-11-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-11-3.  (1)  A notice of cancellation of a policy shall be effective only if it is based on one or more of the following reasons: (a)  Nonpayment of premium; (b)  The driver's license or motor vehicle registration of the named insured, or of any other operator who either resides in the same household or customarily operates an automobile insured under the policy, has been under suspension or revocation during the policy period or, if the policy is a renewal, during its policy period or the one hundred eighty (180) days immediately preceding its effective date, unless within seven (7) days from the date of any such cancellation or suspension, the insured shall give insurer written notice of such revocation or suspension and shall direct the insurer to exclude from coverage under said policy the person whose license was so suspended or revoked; further use of the insured vehicle by an excluded driver shall be grounds for immediate cancellation of a policy; or (c)  Failure to make timely payment of dues to, or to maintain membership in good standing with, a designated association, corporation, or other organization where the original issue of such policy or renewal was dependent upon such membership. (2)  A notice of cancellation of a policy shall not be effective if it is based on one or more nonfault incidents involving the insured. ( * * *23)  This section shall not apply to any policy or coverage which has been in effect less than sixty (60) days at the time notice of cancellation is mailed or delivered by the insurer, unless it is a renewal policy. ( * * *34)  Modification of automobile physical damage coverage by the inclusion of a deductible not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall not be deemed a cancellation of the coverage or of the policy. ( * * *45)  This section shall not apply to nonrenewal. SECTION 3.  Section 83-11-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [From July 1, 2025, until July 1, 2026, this section shall read as follows:] 83-11-7.  No insurer shall fail to renew a policy to any coverage issued or renewed on or before June 30, 2026, unless it shall mail or deliver to the named insured, at the address shown in the policy and to the named creditor loss payee, at least thirty (30) days' advance notice of its intention not to renew.  No insurer shall fail to renew a policy to any coverage issued or renewed on or before June 30, 2026, solely based on consideration of one or more nonfault incidents. This section shall not apply if there is no named creditor loss payee and: (a)  If the insurer has manifested its willingness to renew, subject to certain specified conditions which are not met by the insured; nor (b)  If the insured has manifested its unwillingness to renew; nor (c)  In case of nonpayment of premium; nor (d)  In case of failure to make timely payment of dues to, or to maintain membership in good standing with, a designated association, corporation or other organization where the original issue of such policy or renewal was dependent upon such membership; provided that, notwithstanding the failure of an insurer to comply with this section, the policy shall terminate on the effective date of any other insurance policy with respect to any automobile designated in both policies. A notice of nonrenewal is not required when a replacement policy form is issued by the same insurer or when an insured is transferred to a licensed affiliate of the insurer, so long as the transfer or replacement results in the same or substantially similar coverage.  Whenever a replacement policy form is issued by the same insurer, or when transfer of an insured to a licensed  affiliate occurs documents signed by the insured are applicable to the replacement policy form, the coverage transferred to a licensed affiliate insurer, or both, and remain valid and enforceable.  An insured shall not be transferred to a licensed affiliation only on the basis of one or more nonfault incidents. Whenever a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage is issued by the same insurer, or by a licensed affiliate insurer, such insurer shall mail or deliver to the policyholder, at least thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date of renewal, written notice of any terms or conditions that are less favorable to the policyholder. A transferring insurer shall notify the Mississippi Insurance Department at least forty-five (45) days in advance of notifying a policyholder that its personal or commercial lines insurance policies will be transferred to another licensed insurer within the same insurance group or same holding company.  The notice shall include the name of insurer transferring the personal or commercial lines policies and the name and financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred personal or commercial lines policies. A transferring insurer shall provide the policyholder written notice of the policy transfer at least thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the policy term and shall include the financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred policy.  Such notice must be provided to the policyholder with the notice of renewal premium at least thirty (30) days before the effective date of the transfer. Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the effective date of such renewal, and if a policy shall be cancelled as authorized by this article prior to such policy's renewal, such cancellation shall terminate any right of renewal conferred by this article. [From and after July 1, 2026, this section shall read as follows:] 83-11-7.  No insurer shall fail to renew a policy or issue a reduction in coverage to any coverage issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2026, unless it shall mail or deliver to the named insured, at the address shown in the policy and to the named creditor loss payee, at least forty-five (45) days advance notice of its intention not to renew.  No insurer shall fail to renew a policy or issue a reduction in coverage to any coverage issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2026, solely based on consideration of one or more nonfault incidents.  This section shall not apply if there is no named creditor loss payee and: (a)  If the insurer has manifested its willingness to renew, subject to certain specified conditions which are not met by the insured; nor (b)  If the insured has manifested its unwillingness to renew; nor (c)  In case of nonpayment of premium; nor (d)  In case of failure to make timely payment of dues to, or to maintain membership in good standing with, a designated association, corporation or other organization where the original issue of such policy or renewal was dependent upon such membership; provided that, notwithstanding the failure of an insurer to comply with this section, the policy shall terminate on the effective date of any other insurance policy with respect to any automobile designated in both policies. A notice of nonrenewal is not required when a replacement policy form is issued by the same insurer or when an insured is transferred to a licensed affiliate of the insurer, so long as the transfer or replacement results in the same or substantially similar coverage.  Whenever a replacement policy form is issued by the same insurer, or when transfer of an insured to a licensed affiliate occurs, documents signed by the insured are applicable to the replacement policy form, the coverage transferred to a licensed affiliate insurer, or both, and remain valid and enforceable.  An insured shall not be transferred to a licensed affiliation only on the basis of one or more nonfault incidents. Whenever a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage is issued by the same insurer, or by a licensed affiliate insurer, such insurer shall mail or deliver to the policyholder, at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the effective date of renewal, written notice of any terms or conditions that are less favorable to the policyholder. A transferring insurer shall notify the Mississippi Insurance Department at least forty-five (45) days in advance of notifying a policyholder that its personal or commercial lines insurance policies will be transferred to another licensed insurer within the same insurance group or same holding company.  The notice shall include the name of the insurer transferring the personal or commercial lines policies and the name and financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred personal or commercial lines policies. A transferring insurer shall provide the policyholder written notice of the policy transfer at least forty-five (45) days prior to expiration of the policy term and shall include the financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred policy.  Such notice must be provided to the policyholder with the notice of renewal premium at least forty-five (45) days before the effective date of the transfer. Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the effective date of such renewal, and if a policy shall be cancelled as authorized by this article prior to such policy's renewal, such cancellation shall terminate any right of renewal conferred by this article. If the insurer fails to meet the notice requirement of this section, the named insured has the option of continuing the policy or contract for the remainder of the notice period plus an additional forty-five (45) days at the premium rate of the existing policy or contract.  Such option shall continue in forty-five-day increments until the insurer provides the notice required in this section. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.